Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB53.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6123. Waiver of fee for corrected or duplicate State documents.(a) Requirements for waiver.--A person who satisfies the following requirements and does not have access to the original document the person is seeking to replace or correct is eligible for a waiver of fees under subsections (b) and (c) if:(1) All of the following apply:(i) The person has been granted relief under section 6107(b) (relating to hearings) or 6108 (relating to relief).(ii) The relief under subparagraph (i) was granted 123456789101112131415161718 no more than 90 days prior to the person applying for a waiver under this section.(2) The person does not qualify under paragraph (1) but was the subject of abuse within the previous 120 days and the abuse is verified through one of the following methods:(i) A statement by an employee, agent or volunteer of a victim service provider, an attorney, a medical professional or a mental health professional from whom the victim has sought assistance relating to the abuse, including the use of a standardized form under subsection (e).(ii) A statement verifying the abuse. An individual who provides materially false information in the statement under this clause shall be subject to a penalty of $50 plus the fee charged for the document the individual sought to obtain under this section.(b) Waiver of fee by Department of Transportation.--Upon application of a person who qualifies under subsection (a), the Department of Transportation shall waive the fee for a duplicate or corrected certificate of title, photo identification card, noncommercial driver's license, commercial driver's license, camera card, learner's permit or registration card. A qualifying person with dependents shall also receive a waiver of fee under this section for a duplicate or corrected document for the person's dependents.(c) Waiver of fee by Department of Health.--Upon application of a person who qualifies under subsection (a), the Department of Health shall waive the fee for a certified copy of birth record. A qualifying person with dependents shall also receive a waiver of fee under this section for a duplicate or corrected 20250HB0053PN0043 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 document for the person's dependents.(d) Implementation by agencies.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Transportation and the Department of Health shall establish a statement of policy providing for applications made under subsection (b) or (c), as applicable. A statement of policy under this subsection shall be made available on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be reviewed by the agency at least every five years.(e) Forms.--The Office of Victim Advocate shall develop standardized forms for documenting abuse and providing a method for third party attestation of abuse under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0053PN0043 - 3 - 12345678910111213